Alaska statutes. Title 30. Navigation, Harbors, Shipping, and Transportation Facilities.
Article 2. Vessels Abandoned on Business Premises of Persons Engaged in Repair Business.

Sec. 30.30.110.
Disposition of vessels by persons in vessel storage or repair business.

When a person abandons a vessel on the premises of a vessel storage or repair business, the owner of the business or the business owner’s authorized representative may

sell or dispose of the vessel under AS

30.30.110

—

30.30.150

; or

notify a state agency, municipality, or peace officer that the vessel is a derelict vessel subject to impoundment under AS

30.30.010

—

30.30.090

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 131 SLA 1975; am § 24 ch 111 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The
2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in the introductory language, inserted “storage or” preceding “repair business”, added (2), and made related changes.

Sec. 30.30.120.
When vessel abandoned.

A vessel is abandoned on the premises of a vessel storage or repair business when all of the following conditions have been satisfied:

the service requested or required by a person whose vessel is towed or brought to a vessel storage or repair business, including towing and rendering estimates of the cost of repairs, has been performed;

no authorization is given to perform any further service with respect to the vessel, but the vessel is left on the storage or repair business premises;

the owner of the storage or repair business or the business owner’s authorized representative has given notice by registered or certified mail, with a return receipt, to the registered owner of the vessel at the address on record at the vessel storage or repair business and the address on record in a state agency or the United States Coast Guard, and to any person with a recorded interest in the vessel, stating that, if the vessel is not repossessed within 30 days after the mailing of the notice, it will be sold or disposed of; the notice also must contain a description of the vessel and its location, and it need not be sent to an owner or a person with an unrecorded interest in the vessel whose name or address cannot be determined; and

the vessel is not repossessed within the 30-day period specified in (3) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 131 SLA 1975; am § 12 ch 65 SLA 2013; am § 25 ch 111 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective September 25, 2013, in (3), substituted “agency” for “department” following “on record in a state”.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, inserted “storage or” preceding “repair business” throughout the section, in (1) deleted “but not limited to” preceding “towing and rendering”.

Sec. 30.30.130.
Sale or disposition of vessel.

When a vessel is abandoned, the owner of the vessel storage or repair business, or the business owner’s authorized representative, after one public advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in the state, may negotiate a sale of the vessel or dispose of it. However, the vessel may not be sold or disposed of within less than 30 days after publication of the advertisement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 131 SLA 1975; am § 26 ch 111 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in the first sentence, inserted “storage or” preceding “repair business”, in the second sentence substituted “30 days” for “five days” following “within less than”.

Sec. 30.30.140.
Disposition of proceeds.

The authorized seller of the abandoned vessel is entitled to the proceeds of the sale to the extent that compensation is due to the seller for services rendered with respect to the vessel, including reasonable and customary charges for towing, handling, storage, and the cost of notices and advertising required by AS

30.30.130

. A lienholder shall receive priority of payment from the balance of the proceeds to the extent of the lien.
Any remaining balance shall be forwarded to the registered owner of the vessel, if the registered owner can be found.
If the registered owner cannot be found, the balance shall be deposited with the commissioner of administration and shall be paid out to the registered owner of the vessel if a proper claim is filed for it within one year from the execution of the sale agreement.
If no claim is made within that year, the money shall escheat to the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 131 SLA 1975)

Sec. 30.30.150.
Effect of transfer of title.

The transfer of title and interest by sale under AS

30.30.140

is a transfer by operation of law. However, a bill of sale executed by an authorized seller is satisfactory evidence authorizing the transfer of the title or interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 131 SLA 1975)